California, session 20252026, SB985.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the “Fix 911 Act.”SEC. 2. Section 53121 of the Government Code is amended to read:53121. (a) The Office of Emergency Services shall develop a plan and timeline of target dates for the testing, implementation, and operation of a Next Generation 911 emergency communication system, including text to 911 service, throughout California.(b) In order to maximize efficiency and contain costs, the Next Generation 911 emergency communication system shall incorporate, where consistent with public safety and technologically feasible, shared infrastructure and elements of other public safety and emergency communications networks, including, but not limited to, all of the following:(1) Public safety communications identified in the annual plan required by subdivision (b) of Section 15277.(2) Local and regional public safety broadband networks authorized by the federal American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5).(3) Public safety broadband networks authorized by the federal Middle Class Tax Relief and Job Creation Act of 2012 (Public Law 112-96).(4) Public safety radio and communications facilities used for the purpose of public warnings pursuant to Section 15254.(c) (1) The Office of Emergency Services shall provide quarterly reports to the Legislature on the development and implementation of, as well as total and current year funding spent on, the Next Generation 911 system in California. These reports shall document progress toward, as well as major challenges facing, statewide development and implementation of Next Generation 911. Such challenges include technological, operational, and legal or contractual challenges, as well as other challenges identified by the office. The quarterly reports shall also include information on proposed solutions to these identified challenges, the potential costs of such solutions, effects on and changes to the implementation timeline and expected dates of completion, as well as progress made in implementing chosen solutions. These reports shall also include recommendations made by the State 911 Advisory Board to the office and any actions taken in response to those recommendations or any decisions made that contradict those recommendations, including justification for any decision that contradicts those recommendations.(2) The Office of Emergency Services shall submit a copy of each quarterly report to the chairpersons of the budget committees of both houses, and the appropriate subcommittees in each house, of the Legislature that consider the state budget budget, the Assembly and Senate Committees on Emergency Management, the State 911 Advisory Board, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office on or before March 31, June 30, September 30, and December 31 January 1, April 1, July 1, and October 1 of each year in compliance with Section 9795.(3) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5, the Office of Emergency Services shall continue submitting quarterly reports until the Next Generation 911 system has been fully implemented and the legacy 911 system has been decommissioned.